Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-1213
Returns; failure to make; penalty.

Any person failing or refusing to make returns or reports, as required by sections 57-1201 to 57-1214, and remaining in default for thirty days after notice to him or her by the Tax Commissioner, or failing to comply with any other requirement of sections 57-1201 to 57-1214, shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1983, LB 356, § 25.